Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,157
Mandated coverages or services; applicability.

If the laws of any other state specify that a policy issued for delivery in that state need not provide the coverages or services mandated by that state to certificate holders who are not residents or not employed in that state, and if such a policy issued for delivery in that state does not provide the coverages or services mandated by that state to certificate holders who are not residents or not employed in that state, then the coverages or services mandated by sections 44-769 to 44-7,101 shall apply to a certificate issued to certificate holders who are residents of or employed in this state.

Laws 2005, LB 119, § 38;

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 1.